North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 1. Certificate of Authority.

§ 55A-15-01.
Authority to conduct affairs required.

A foreign corporation shall not conduct affairs in this State until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

Without excluding other activities which might not constitute conducting affairs in this State, a foreign corporation shall not be considered to be conducting affairs in this State solely for the purposes of this Chapter, by reason of carrying on in this State any one or more of the following activities:

Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or affecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes;

Holding meetings of its directors or members or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts or borrowing money in this State, with or without security, even if such borrowings are repeated and continuous transactions;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of memberships or securities, or appointing and maintaining trustees or despositories with relation to those securities;

Soliciting or procuring orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where the orders require acceptance without this State before becoming binding contracts;

Making or investing in loans with or without security including servicing of mortgages or deeds of trust through independent agencies within the State, the conducting of foreclosure proceedings and sale, the acquiring of property at foreclosure sale, and the management and rental of such property for a reasonable time while liquidating its investment, provided no office or agency therefor is maintained in this State;

Taking security for or collecting debts due to it or enforcing any rights in property securing the same;

Conducting affairs in interstate commerce;

Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of six months and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature;

Selling through independent contractors;

Owning, without more, real or personal property.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-15-02.
Consequences of conducting affairs without authority.

No foreign corporation conducting affairs in this State without permission obtained through a certificate of authority under this Chapter or through domestication under prior acts shall be permitted to maintain any action or proceeding in any court of this State unless the foreign corporation has obtained a certificate of authority prior to trial.An issue arising under this subsection must be raised by motion and determined by the trial judge prior to trial.

A foreign corporation failing to obtain a certificate of authority as required by this Chapter or by prior acts then applicable shall be liable to the State for the years or parts thereof during which it conducted affairs in this State without a certificate of authority in an amount equal to all fees and taxes which would have been imposed by law upon the corporation had it duly applied for and received such permission, plus interest and all penalties imposed by law for failure to pay such fees and taxes. In addition, the foreign corporation shall be liable for a civil penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day, but not to exceed a total of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each year or part thereof, it conducts affairs in this State without a certificate of authority. The Attorney General may bring actions to recover all amounts due the State under the provisions of this subsection. The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of its corporate acts or prevent it from defending any proceeding in this State.

The Secretary of State is hereby directed to require that every foreign corporation conducting affairs in this State comply with the provisions of this Chapter. The Secretary of State is authorized to employ such assistants as shall be deemed necessary in the Secretary of State’s office for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this Article and for making such investigations as shall be necessary to ascertain foreign corporations now conducting affairs in this State which may have failed to comply with the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 118; 1999-151, s. 2.

North Carolina Commentary

This section adopts the scheme of cumulative penalties ($10.00 per day up to $1,000 per year) for failure to qualify instead of the one-time $500 penalty under former G.S. 55A-76.

§ 55A-15-03.
Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this State by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation or, if its name is unavailable for use in this State, a corporate name that satisfies the requirements of Article 3 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes;

The name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

Its date of incorporation and period of duration;

The street address, and mailing address if different from the street address, of its principal office;

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of its registered office in this State, the county in which the registered office is located, and the name of its registered agent at that office;

The names and usual business addresses of its current officers; and

Whether it has members.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence (or a document of similar import) duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.

If the Secretary of State finds that the application conforms to law, the Secretary of State shall when all fees have been tended as prescribed in this Chapter:

Endorse on the application and an exact or conformed copy thereof the word “filed” and the hour, day, month, and year of the filing thereof;

File in the Secretary of State’s office the application and the certificate of existence (or document of similar import as described in subsection (b) of this section);

Issue a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this State to which the Secretary of State shall affix the exact or conformed copy of the application; and

Send to the foreign corporation or its representative the certificate of authority, together with the exact or conformed copy of the application affixed thereto.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1957, c. 979, s. 14; 1969, c. 875, s. 8; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2001-358, s. 21; 2001-387, ss. 169(b), 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

North Carolina Commentary

This Act does not bring forward the requirement of former G.S. 55A-61(6) that a foreign corporation include in its application the purposes it desires to pursue in this State. In addition, the application under this Act is submitted with a certificate of existence or good standing rather than the certified charter documents required under former G.S. 55A-62.

§ 55A-15-04.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this State shall obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Secretary of State if it changes:

Its corporate name;

The period of its duration; or

The state or country of its incorporation.

A foreign corporation may apply for an amended certificate of authority by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing that sets forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and the name in which the corporation is authorized to conduct affairs in North Carolina if different;

The name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

The date it was originally authorized to conduct affairs in this State; and

A statement of the change or changes being made.Except for the content of the application, the requirements of

G.S. 55A-15-03

for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-15-05.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to conduct affairs in this State subject, however, to the right of the State to revoke the certificate as provided in this Chapter. A foreign corporation, however, is not eligible or entitled to qualify in this State as executor, administrator, or guardian, or as trustee under the will of any person domiciled in this State at the time of his death.

Except as otherwise provided by this Chapter, a foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same but no greater rights and has the same but no greater privileges as, and is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic corporation of like character.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-15-06.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 22, effective January 1, 2002.

§ 55A-15-07.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this State must maintain a registered office and registered agent as required by Article 4 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and is subject to service on the Secretary of State under that Article.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 101(e); 2001-358, s. 48(b); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§§ 55A-15-08 through 55A-15-10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 48(c), effective January 1, 2002.

§§ 55A-15-11 through 55A-15-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.